District of Columbia statutes.
36-405

Preservation of secrecy.

In an action under this chapter, a court shall preserve the secrecy of an alleged trade secret by reasonable means, which may include granting protective orders in connection with discovery proceedings, holding in-camera hearings, or sealing the records of the action and ordering any person involved in the litigation not to disclose an alleged trade secret without prior court approval.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-216, § 6, 36 DCR 519
1981 Ed., § 48-505.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.